Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2808
Act; exemption; accounting of income.

If the budget of a proprietary function is included in the municipal budget statement created pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act, the Municipal Proprietary Function Act need not be followed for that proprietary function. Any income from a proprietary function which is transferred to the general fund of the municipality shall be shown as a source of revenue in the municipal budget statement created pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 8.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.